California, session 20252026, AB417.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Among the purposes of this act is to consolidate and streamline the notice and hearing requirements associated with the formation of community revitalization and investment authorities.(b) The changes made to the formation process and the timing of the effective date of this act, however, shall not be interpreted in a manner so as to disrupt or delay the formation process for an authority that commenced prior to the effective date of this act.(c) Authorities that have initiated the formation process when this act takes effect, as evidenced by the adoption of the resolution or entering into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Section 62001 of the Government Code, may choose to complete the formation process in accordance with the requirements and timelines in effect on the date that the resolution of intention was adopted.SEC. 2. Section 53398.52 of the Government Code is amended to read:53398.52. (a) (1) A district may finance any of the following:(A) The purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, seismic retrofit, or rehabilitation of any real or other tangible property with an estimated useful life of 15 years or longer that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b).(B) The planning and design work that is directly related to the purchase, construction, expansion, or rehabilitation of property.(C) The costs described in Sections 53398.56 and 53398.57.(D) (i) The ongoing or capitalized costs to maintain public capital facilities financed in whole or in part by the district.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), a district shall not use the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to the authority in Article 4 (commencing with Section 53398.77) to finance maintenance of any kind.(2) The facilities are not required to be physically located within the boundaries of the district. However, any facilities financed outside of a district shall have a tangible connection to the work of the district, as detailed in the infrastructure financing plan adopted pursuant to Section 53398.69.(3) A district shall not finance the costs of an ongoing operation or providing services of any kind.(b) The district shall finance only public capital facilities or other specified projects of communitywide significance that provide significant benefits to the district or the surrounding community, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Highways, interchanges, ramps and bridges, arterial streets, parking facilities, and transit facilities.(2) Sewage treatment and water reclamation plants and interceptor pipes.(3) Facilities for the collection and treatment of water for urban uses.(4) Flood control levees and dams, retention basins, and drainage channels.(5) Childcare facilities.(6) Libraries.(7) Parks, recreational facilities, and open space.(8) Facilities for the transfer and disposal of solid waste, including transfer stations and vehicles.(9) Brownfield restoration and other environmental mitigation.(10) The development of projects on a former military base, provided that the projects are consistent with the military base authority reuse plan and are approved by the military base reuse authority, if applicable.(11) The repayment of the transfer of funds to a military base reuse authority pursuant to Section 67851 that occurred on or after the creation of the district.(12) The acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing for persons of very low, low, and moderate income, as defined in Sections 50105 and 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, for rent or purchase.(13) Acquisition, construction, or repair of industrial structures for private use.(14) (A) Acquisition, construction, or repair of commercial structures by the small business occupant of such structures, if such acquisition, construction, or repair is for purposes of fostering economic recovery of a community and of ensuring the long-term economic sustainability of small businesses.(B) For purposes of this paragraph and subject to subparagraph (C), “small business” means an independently owned and operated business that is not dominant in its field of operation, the principal office of which is located in California, the officers of which are domiciled in California, and which, together with affiliates, has 100 or fewer employees, and average annual gross receipts of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) or less over the previous three years, or is a manufacturer, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14837, with 100 or fewer employees. An “independently owned and operated business” shall include a formula retail business that is an independently owned franchise.(C) A district may set a lower threshold for the average annual gross receipts over the previous three years and for the number of employees described in subparagraph (B).(15) Transit priority projects, as defined in Section 21155 of the Public Resources Code, that are located within a transit priority project area. For purposes of this paragraph, a transit priority project area may include a military base reuse plan that meets the definition of a transit priority project area and it may include a contaminated site within a transit priority project area.(16) Projects that implement a sustainable communities strategy, when the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Division 1 of Title 7, has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.(17) Projects that enable communities to adapt to the impacts of climate change, including, but not limited to, higher average temperatures, decreased air and water quality, the spread of infectious and vector-borne diseases, other public health impacts, extreme weather events, sea level rise, flooding, heat waves, wildfires, and drought. This paragraph includes projects intended to improve air quality.(18) Port or harbor infrastructure, as defined by Section 1698 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.(19) The acquisition, construction, or improvement of broadband Internet access service. For purposes of this section, “broadband Internet access services” has the same meaning as defined in Section 53167. A district that acquires, constructs, or improves broadband Internet access service may transfer the management and control of those facilities to a local agency that is authorized to provide broadband Internet access service, and that local agency when providing that service shall comply with the requirements of Article 12 (commencing with Section 53167) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5.(20) Facilities in which nonprofit community organizations provide health, youth, homeless, and social services.(21) (A) For districts at least partially in high or very high fire hazard severity zones designated by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, the following:(i) Heavy equipment to be used for vegetation clearance and firebreaks.(ii) Undergrounding of local publicly owned electric utilities, as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code, against wildfires.(iii) Equipment used for fire watch, prevention, and fighting, including, but not limited to, helicopters, air tankers, and technological advancements to weather and wind science infrastructure, risk modeling, and prediction.(B) A district shall not use the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to the authority in Article 4 (commencing with Section 53398.77) to finance the equipment described in clause (i) or (iii) of subparagraph (A).(c) The district shall require, by recorded covenants or restrictions, that housing units built pursuant to this section shall remain available at affordable housing costs to, and occupied by, persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income for the longest feasible time, but for not less than 55 years for rental units and 45 years for owner-occupied units.(d) The district may finance mixed-income housing developments, but may finance only those units in such a development that are restricted to occupancy by persons of very low, low, or moderate incomes as defined in Sections 50105 and 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, and those onsite facilities for childcare, after school care, and social services that are integrally linked to the tenants of the restricted units.(e) A district may utilize any powers under either the Polanco Redevelopment Act (Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 33459) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code) or Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 25403) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, and finance any action necessary to implement that act.SEC. 3. Section 53398.66 of the Government Code is amended to read:53398.66. (a) The draft-enhanced infrastructure financing plan shall be made available to the public and to each landowner within the area on a designated internet website and at a meeting held at least 30 days before the first public hearing. The purposes of the meeting shall be to allow the staff of the public financing authority to present the draft-enhanced infrastructure financing plan, answer questions about the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, and consider comments about the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(b) (1) (A) The public financing authority shall consider adoption of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan at two public hearings that shall take place at least 30 days apart.(B) In addition to the notice given to landowners and affected taxing entities pursuant to Sections 53398.60 and 53398.61, the public financing authority shall post notice of each meeting or public hearing required by this section in an easily identifiable and accessible location on the enhanced infrastructure financing district’s internet website and shall mail a written notice of the meeting or public hearing to each landowner, each resident, and each taxing entity at least 10 days before the meeting or public hearing.(2) At the first public hearing, the public financing authority shall consider any written and oral comments and take action to modify or reject the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(3) If the enhanced infrastructure financing plan is not rejected at the first public hearing, then the public financing authority shall conduct a protest proceeding at the second public hearing to consider whether the landowners and residents within the enhanced infrastructure financing plan area wish to present oral or written protests against the adoption of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(c) (1) The notices required in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall do all of the following, as applicable:(A) Describe specifically the boundaries of the proposed area.(B) Describe the purpose of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(C) State the day, hour, and place when and where any and all persons having any comments on the proposed enhanced infrastructure financing plan may appear to provide written or oral comments to the enhanced infrastructure financing district.(D) Notice of the first public hearing shall include a summary of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan and shall identify a location accessible to the public where the enhanced infrastructure financing plan proposed to be presented at the first public hearing can be reviewed.(E) Notice of the second public hearing to consider any written or oral protests shall contain a copy of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, and shall inform the landowner and resident of their right to submit an oral or written protest before the close of the public hearing. The protest may state that the landowner or resident objects to the public financing authority taking action to implement the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(2) At the second public hearing, the public financing authority shall consider all written and oral protests received before the close of the public hearing along with the recommendations, if any, of affected taxing entities, and shall terminate the proceedings or adopt the enhanced infrastructure financing plan subject to confirmation by the voters at an election called for that purpose. The public financing authority shall terminate the proceedings if there is a majority protest. A majority protest exists if protests have been filed representing over 50 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age. An election shall be called if between 25 percent and 50 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age file a protest.(d) An election required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be held within 90 days of the public hearing and may be held by mail-in ballot. The public financing authority shall adopt, at a duly noticed public hearing, procedures for this election.(e) If a majority of the landowners and residents vote against the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, then the public financing authority shall not take any further action to implement the proposed enhanced infrastructure financing plan. The public financing authority shall not propose a new or revised enhanced infrastructure financing plan to the affected landowners and residents for at least one year following the date of an election in which the enhanced infrastructure financing plan was rejected.(f) At the hour set in the notices required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the public financing authority shall consider all written and oral comments.(g) If less than 25 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age file a protest, the public financing authority may adopt the enhanced infrastructure financing plan at the conclusion of the second public hearing by resolution. The resolution adopting the enhanced infrastructure financing plan shall be subject to referendum as prescribed by law.(h) The public financing authority shall consider and adopt an amendment or amendments to an enhanced infrastructure financing plan in accordance with the provisions of this section.(i) (1) A separate notice of the first public hearing shall also be published not less than once a week for four successive weeks before the first public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the area lies. The notice shall state that the district will be used to finance public facilities or development, briefly describe the public facilities or development, briefly describe the proposed financial arrangements, including the proposed commitment of incremental tax revenue, describe the boundaries of the proposed district, and state the day, hour, and place when and where any persons having any objections to the proposed infrastructure financing plan, or the regularity of any of the prior proceedings, may appear before the public financing authority and object to the adoption of the proposed plan by the public financing authority.(2) A separate notice of the second public hearing shall also be published not less than 10 days before the second public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the area lies. The notice shall state that the district will be used to finance public facilities or development, briefly describe the public facilities or development, briefly describe the proposed financial arrangements, describe the boundaries of the proposed district, and state the day, hour, and place when and where any persons having any objections to the proposed infrastructure financing plan, or the regularity of any of the prior proceedings, may appear before the public financing authority and object to the adoption of the proposed plan by the public financing authority.(j) (1) The public financing authority shall review the enhanced infrastructure financing plan at least annually and make any amendments that are necessary and appropriate and shall require the preparation of an annual independent financial audit paid for from revenues of the enhanced infrastructure financing district.(A) Amendments to an approved infrastructure financing plan, including proposals to finance affordable housing and additional eligible projects, as specified in Section 53398.52, or to add a participating taxing entity and its representatives as members of a public financing authority after the date of district formation, may be approved by a majority vote of the public financing authority at a public hearing held following the provision of a 30-day mailed notice describing the proposed changes to all property owners, residents, and affected taxing entities.(B) Amendments that propose any of the following shall be adopted in accordance with all notices and hearing requirements for the affected landowners and residents within the proposed additional territory applicable to an initial proposed enhanced infrastructure financing plan:(i) Addition of new territory to a district.(ii) Increase of the limit of the total number of dollars in local taxes allocated to the plan, except where the increase is a result of an affected taxing entity agreeing to participate in the existing district and the plan is amended pursuant to subparagraph (A).(iii) Approval of a public facility or development that was not proposed to be financed or assisted by the district in the approved plan.(2) A public financing authority shall adopt an annual report within seven months of the close of each fiscal year, after holding a public hearing. Written copies of the draft report shall be made available to the public 30 days before the public hearing. The public financing authority shall cause the draft report to be posted in an easily identifiable and accessible location on the enhanced infrastructure financing district’s internet website and shall mail a written notice of the availability of the draft report on the internet website to each owner of land and each resident within the area covered by the enhanced infrastructure financing plan and to each taxing entity that has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 53398.68.(3) The annual report shall contain all of the following:(A) A description of the projects undertaken in the fiscal year, including any rehabilitation of structures, and a comparison of the progress expected to be made on those projects compared to the actual progress.(B) A chart comparing the actual revenues and expenses, including administrative costs, of the public financing authority to the budgeted revenues and expenses.(C) The amount of tax increment revenues received.(D) An assessment of the status regarding completion of the enhanced infrastructure financing district’s projects.(E) The amount of revenues expended to assist private businesses.(4) If the public financing authority fails to provide the annual report required by paragraph (3), the public financing authority shall not spend any funds received pursuant to a resolution adopted pursuant to this chapter until the public financing authority has provided the report.SEC. 4. Section 53398.68 of the Government Code is amended to read:53398.68. (a) The public financing authority shall not adopt a resolution proposing formation of a district and providing for the division of taxes of any affected taxing entity pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 53398.75) unless a resolution approving the plan has been adopted by the governing body of each affected taxing entity that is proposed to be subject to division of taxes pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 53398.75) and has been filed with the legislative body at or before the time of the hearing.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the public financing authority from amending its infrastructure financing plan and adopting a resolution proposing formation of the enhanced infrastructure financing district without allocation of the tax revenues of any affected taxing entity that has not approved the infrastructure financing plan by resolution of the governing body of the affected taxing entity.(c) (1) At any time after the date of district formation, an affected taxing entity may choose to approve the plan and participate in the division of taxes used to finance the activities of a district, by adopting a resolution of the governing body. (2) If, after the date of district formation, an affected taxing entity adopts a resolution approving the plan and to participate in the division of taxes used to finance an enhanced infrastructure financing district, the division of taxes shall be based upon the last equalized assessment roll that is used for the district pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 53398.75.SEC. 5. Section 62001 of the Government Code is amended to read:62001. (a) A community revitalization and investment authority is a public body, corporate and politic, with jurisdiction to carry out a community revitalization plan within a community revitalization and investment area. The authority shall be deemed to be the “agency” described in subdivision (b) of Section 16 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for purposes of receiving tax increment revenues. The authority shall have only those powers and duties specifically set forth in Section 62002.(b) (1) An authority may be created in any one of the following ways:(A) A city, county, or city and county may adopt a resolution creating an authority. The composition of the governing board shall be comprised as set forth in subdivision (c).(B) A city, county, city and county, and special district, as special district is defined in subdivision (m) of Section 95 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or any combination thereof, may create an authority by entering into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1.(2) (A) A school entity, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, may not participate in an authority created pursuant to this part.(B) A successor agency, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 34171 of the Health and Safety Code, may not participate in an authority created pursuant to this part, and an entity created pursuant to this part shall not receive any portion of the property tax revenues or other moneys distributed pursuant to Section 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) An authority formed by a city or county that created a redevelopment agency that was dissolved pursuant to Part 1.85 (commencing with Section 34170) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code shall not become effective until the successor agency or designated local authority for the former redevelopment agency has adopted findings of fact stating all of the following:(A) The agency has received a finding of completion from the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 34179.7 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) Former redevelopment agency assets that are the subject of litigation against the state, where the city or county or its successor agency or designated local authority are a named plaintiff, have not been or will not be used to benefit any efforts of an authority formed under this part unless the litigation has been resolved by entry of a final judgment by any court of competent jurisdiction and any appeals have been exhausted.(C) The agency has complied with all orders of the Controller pursuant to Section 34167.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) (1) The governing board of an authority created pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be appointed by the legislative body of the city, county, or city and county that created the authority and shall include three members of the legislative body of the city, county, or city and county that created the authority and two public members. The legislative body may appoint one of its members to be an alternate member of the legislative body who may serve and vote in place of a member who is absent or disqualifies themselves from participating in a meeting of the authority. The appointment of the two public members shall be subject to Sections 54970 and 54972. The two public members shall live or work within the community revitalization and investment area.(2) The governing body of the authority created pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be comprised of a majority of members from the legislative bodies of the public agencies that created the authority, and a minimum of two public members who live or work within the community revitalization and investment area. A legislative body of a participating affected taxing entity may appoint one of its members to be an alternate member of the legislative body who may serve and vote in place of a member who is absent or disqualifies themselves from participating in a meeting of the authority. The majority of the board shall appoint the public members to the governing body. The appointment of the public members shall be subject to Sections 54970 and 54972.(3) If an authority has more than three participating affected taxing entities, the legislative bodies of the taxing entities may, upon agreement by all participating affected taxing entities appoint only one member of their respective legislative bodies, and one alternate member, to the authority, and a minimum of two members of the public chosen by the legislative bodies of the participating entities. The appointment of the public members shall be subject to Sections 54970 and 54972.(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “legislative body” may include a directly elected mayor of a charter city who is not a member of the city’s legislative body under the city’s adopted charter.(d) An authority may carry out a community revitalization plan within a community revitalization and investment area where not less than 60 percent of the land calculated by census tracts, census block groups, as defined by the United States Census Bureau, or any combination of both within the area shall meet either of the following conditions:(1) Have an annual median household income that is less than, at the option of the authority, 80 percent of the statewide, countywide, or citywide annual median income.(2) Meet three of the following four conditions:(A) An unemployment rate that is at least 3 percentage points higher than the statewide average annual unemployment rate, as defined by the report on labor market information published by the Employment Development Department in March of the year in which the community revitalization plan is prepared. In determining the unemployment rate within the community revitalization and investment area, an authority may use unemployment data from the periodic American Community Survey published by the United States Census Bureau.(B) Crime rates, as documented by records maintained by the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction in the proposed plan area for violent or property crime offenses, that are at least 5 percent higher than the statewide average crime rate for violent or property crime offenses, as defined by the most recent annual report of the Criminal Justice Statistics Center within the Department of Justice, when data is available on the Attorney General’s internet website. The crime rate shall be calculated by taking the local crime incidents for violent or property crimes, or any offense within those categories, for the most recent calendar year for which the Department of Justice maintains data, divided by the total population of the proposed plan area, multiplied by 100,000. If the local crime rate for the proposed plan area exceeds the statewide average rate for either violent or property crime, or any offense within these categories, by more than 5 percent, then the condition described in this subparagraph shall be met.(C) Deteriorated or inadequate infrastructure, including streets, sidewalks, water supply, sewer treatment or processing, and parks.(D) Deteriorated commercial or residential structures.(e) As an alternative, and in addition to the areas described in subdivision (d), an authority may also carry out a community revitalization plan within a community revitalization and investment area that meets any of the following conditions:(1) The area is established within a former military base that is principally characterized by deteriorated or inadequate infrastructure and structures. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the governing board of an authority established within a former military base shall include a member of the military base closure commission as a public member.(2) The census tracts or census block groups, as defined by the United States Census Bureau, within the area are situated within a disadvantaged community as described in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) Sites identified in the inventory of land in a city or county’s housing element that are suitable for residential development pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583.2, including parcels that are zoned to allow transit priority projects, as defined under Chapter 4.2 (commencing with Section 21155) of Division 13 of the Public Resources Code, consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080, has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination of the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy.(f) An authority created pursuant to this part shall be a local public agency subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5), the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1), and the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000)).(g) (1) At any time after the authority is authorized to transact business and exercise its powers, the legislative body or bodies of the local government or governments that created the authority may appropriate the amounts the legislative body or bodies deem necessary for the administrative expenses and overhead of the authority.(2) The money appropriated may be paid to the authority as a grant to defray the expenses and overhead, or as a loan to be repaid upon the terms and conditions as the legislative body may provide. If appropriated as a loan, the property owners and residents within the plan area shall be made third-party beneficiaries of the repayment of the loan. In addition to the common understanding and usual interpretation of the term, “administrative expense” includes, but is not limited to, expenses of planning and dissemination of information.SEC. 6. Section 62004 of the Government Code is amended to read:62004. (a) The draft plan shall be made available to the public and to each property owner within the area at a meeting held at least 30 days prior to the notice given for the first public hearing. The purposes of the meeting shall be to allow the staff of the authority to present the draft plan, answer questions about the plan, and consider comments about the plan.(b) (1) The authority shall consider adoption of the plan at two public hearings that shall take place at least 30 days apart.(2) At the first public hearing, the authority shall consider any written and oral comments and take action to modify or reject the plan.(3) If the plan is not rejected at the first public hearing, then the authority shall conduct a protest proceeding at the second public hearing to consider whether the property owners and residents within the plan area wish to present oral or written protests against the adoption of the plan.(c) (1) Notice of the meeting required by subdivision (a) and the public hearings required by subdivision (b) shall be given in accordance with subdivision (j). The notice shall do all of the following, as applicable:(A) Describe specifically the boundaries of the proposed area.(B) Describe the purpose of the plan.(C) State the day, hour, and place when and where any and all persons having any comments on the proposed plan may appear to provide written or oral comments to the authority.(D) Notice of the first public hearing shall include a summary of the plan and shall identify a location accessible to the public where the plan proposed to be presented and adopted at the first public hearing can be reviewed.(E) Notice of the second public hearing to consider any written or oral protests shall contain a copy of the final plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (b), and shall inform the property owner and resident of their right to submit an oral or written protest before the close of the public hearing. The protest may state that the property owner or resident objects to the authority taking action to implement the plan.(2) At the second public hearing, the authority shall consider all written and oral protests received prior to the close of the public hearing and shall terminate the proceedings or adopt the plan subject to confirmation by the voters at an election called for that purpose. The authority shall terminate the proceedings if there is a majority protest. A majority protest exists if protests have been filed representing over 50 percent of the combined number of property owners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age. An election shall be called if between 25 percent and 50 percent of the combined number of property owners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age file a protest.(d) An election required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be held within 90 days of the public hearing and may be held by mail-in ballot. The authority shall adopt, at a duly noticed public hearing, procedures for this election.(e) If a majority of the property owners and residents vote against the plan, then the authority shall not take any further action to implement the proposed plan. The authority shall not propose a new or revised plan to the affected property owners and residents for at least one year following the date of an election in which the plan was rejected.(f) At the hour set in the notice required by subdivision (b), the authority shall consider all written and oral comments.(g) If less than 25 percent of the combined number of property owners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age file a protest, the authority may adopt the plan at the conclusion of the public hearing by ordinance. The ordinance adopting the plan shall be subject to referendum as prescribed by law.(h) For the purposes of Section 62005, the plan shall be the plan adopted pursuant to this section.(i) The authority shall consider and adopt an amendment or amendments to a plan in accordance with the provisions of this section.(j) The authority shall post notice of the meeting or public hearing required by this section in an easily identifiable and accessible location on the authority’s internet website and shall mail a written notice of the meeting or public hearing to each owner of land and each resident at least 10 days prior to the meeting or public hearing.(1) A separate notice of the first public hearing shall also be published not less than once a week for four successive weeks prior to the first public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the area lies.(2) A separate notice of the second public hearing shall also be published not less than 10 days prior to the second public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the area lies.SEC. 7. Section 62004.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:62004.5. (a) As an alternative to mailing separate mailed notices prior to the meeting or public hearing pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 62004, the authority may mail a notice to each landowner, resident, and affected taxing entity at least 40 days before the meeting held pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 62004. This notice shall include all of the following, as applicable:(1) A summary of the plan, including all required information listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 62004.(2) The internet website where the applicable documents, including those described in Section 62003, will be made available for public viewing or inspection.(3) A designated contact person to receive and process any requests for a mailed or electronically mailed packet of all materials.(4) The location, date, and time of the meeting and the two public hearings held in accordance with Section 62004.(5) A description of the actions that may be taken at the meeting and the two public hearings described in paragraph (4).(6) A description of the schedule, information, and process for accessing any amendments to the plan in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 62006.(7) A description of the schedule, information, and process for accessing annual reports in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 62006.(b) (1) If the first or second public hearing on the plan occurs at the location, date, and time listed in the mailed notice described in subdivision (a), then the authority shall be deemed to comply with the 10-day mailed notice requirement pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 62004.(2) If any public hearing is rescheduled for a later date than listed in the mailed notice described in subdivision (a), due to unanticipated circumstances, the authority shall do all of the following:(A) Publish notice of the rescheduled date and time of the first or second public hearing, at least 10 days before the meeting, in a newspaper in accordance with subdivision (j) of Section 62004.(B) Post, at least 10 days before the rescheduled public hearing, notice of the rescheduled date and time of the first or second public hearing on the internet website described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).(C) Email, at least 10 days before the rescheduled public hearing, notification of the rescheduled date and time of the first or second public hearing to the email contact list assembled and maintained in accordance with subdivision (c).(c) The designated contact person described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall assemble and maintain an email contact list of all landowners, residents, and other interested parties who have expressed interest in receiving information and materials.SEC. 8. Section 62004.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:62004.6. Except for the newspaper notices described in subdivision (j) of Section 62004, a notice required by this part shall be provided in English and in all other languages spoken jointly by 20 percent or more of the population in the jurisdiction of the county of the proposed authority that speaks English less than “very well” and jointly speaks a language other than English according to data from the most recent American Community Survey or data from an equally reliable source.